Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1898.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 912.1(13) and (14) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 912.1. Number of Signers Required for Nomination Petitions of Candidates at Primaries.--Candidates for nomination of offices as listed below shall present a nominating petition containing at least as many valid signatures of registered and enrolled members of the proper party as listed below:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 * * *(13) Senator in the General Assembly: Five hundred[.], except a sitting Senator in the General Assembly who currently holds the office for that district may instead file a certificate of nomination, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, on which the Senator informs the Secretary of the Commonwealth of the intent to seek reelection with their current party. If a Senator in the General Assembly files a certificate of nomination, the Senator may not challenge the nomination petition or nomination papers filed for that office and district. A person may not file a certificate of nomination under this paragraph for the office of Senator in the General Assembly in the election immediately following the redistricting of the Commonwealth. A certificate of nomination may not be posted on the Department of State's publicly accessible Internet website and may only be made available to a person who makes a request to the Secretary of the Commonwealth to examine the certificate of nomination.(14) Representative in the General Assembly: Three hundred[.], except a sitting Representative in the General Assembly who currently holds the office for that district may instead file a certificate of nomination, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, on which the Representative informs the Secretary of the Commonwealth of the intent to seek reelection with their current party. If a Representative in the General Assembly files a certificate of nomination, the Representative may not challenge the nomination petition or nomination papers filed for that office and district. A person may not file a certificate of nomination under this paragraph for the office of Representative in the 20250HB1898PN2368 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 General Assembly in the election immediately following the redistricting of the Commonwealth. A certificate of nomination shall not be posted on the Department of State's publicly accessible Internet website and may only be made available to a person who makes a request to the Secretary of the Commonwealth to examine the certificate of nomination.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1898PN2368 - 3 - 12345678